Maine, session 132, LD1123.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
EDUCATION, DEPARTMENT OF
Special Services Team Z080
Initiative: Provides ongoing funds to establish 2 Public Service Coordinator I positions to
provide technical assistance and facilitate MaineCare reimbursements for local school
districts.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $189,355 $265,180
All Other $14,817 $18,656
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $204,172 $283,836